Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF826.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 325E.3892, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. new text begin (a) new text end For purposes of this section, new text begin the following terms have the meanings given.new text end new text begin (b) new text end "Covered product" means any of the following products or product components: (1) jewelry; (2) toys; (3) cosmetics and personal care products; (4) puzzles, board games, card games, and similar games; (5) play sets and play structures; (6) outdoor games; (7) school suppliesnew text begin , except ink pens and mechanical pencilsnew text end ; (8) pots and pans; (9) cups, bowls, and other food containers; (10) craft supplies and jewelry-making supplies; (11) chalk, crayons, new text begin children'snew text end paints, and other art suppliesnew text begin , except professional artist materials, including but not limited to oil-based paints, water-based paints, paints, pastels, pigments, ceramic glazes, and markersnew text end ; (12) fidget spinners; (13) costumes, costume accessories, and children's and seasonal party supplies; (14) deleted text begin keys,deleted text end key chainsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end and key rings; and (15) clothing, footwear, headwear, and accessories. new text begin (c) "Pastels" means a crayon composed of powdered pigments bonded with gum or resin. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end